Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.260

Misrepresentation of credentials.

(1) A person who is not a licensed hearing aid specialist may not represent himself or herself as being so licensed and may not use in connection with his or her name the words "licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispenser," "hearing instrument specialist," or "hearing aid fitter/dispenser," or a variation, synonym, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses, employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions of a licensed hearing aid specialist.

(2) A person who is not a licensed speech-language pathologist may not represent himself or herself as being so licensed and may not use in connection with his or her name the words including "licensed speech-language pathologist" or a variation, synonym, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses, employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions as a licensed speech-language pathologist.

(3) A person who is not a certified speech-language pathology assistant may not represent himself or herself as being so certified and may not use in connection with his or her name the words including "certified speech-language pathology assistant" or a variation, synonym, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses, employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions as a certified speech-language pathology assistant.

(4) A person who is not a licensed audiologist may not represent himself or herself as being so licensed and may not use in connection with his or her name the words "licensed audiologist" or a variation, synonym, letter, word, sign, number, insignia, coinage, or whatever expresses, employs, or implies these terms, names, or functions of a licensed audiologist.

(5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits a person credentialed in this state under another act from engaging in the practice for which he or she is credentialed.

[ 2014 c 189 s 18; 2009 c 301 s 7; 2002 c 310 s 26; 1998 c 142 s 20; 1996 c 200 s 16.]

NOTES:

Work group—2014 c 189: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Intent—Implementation—2009 c 301: See notes following RCW 18.35.010.

Speech-language pathology assistants—Certification requirements—2009 c 301: See note following RCW 18.35.040.

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.